District of Columbia statutes.
50-2111

Safety impact of fine reductions.

Within 18 months of May 1, 2013, the Mayor shall transmit to the Council an assessment of the safety impact, if any, resulting from the reduced fines required by Title III of this act, which shall include a detailed analysis of any changes in moving violation rates and repeat violation rates.

History

May 1, 2013, D.C. Law 19-307, § 101, 60 DCR 2753

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 days) addition of this section, see § 101 of the Safety-Based Traffic Enforcement Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-50, April 22, 2013, 60 DCR 6339, 20 DCSTAT 1356).

References in Text

“Title III of this act,” referred to in this section, is D.C. Law 19-307, § 301, which amended Section 2600.1 of Title 18 of the District of Columbia Municipal Regulations. The applicability of those DCMR amendments are governed by D.C. Law 19-307, § 401(b).

Editor's Notes

Applicability of D.C. Law 19-307: Section 401(a) of D.C. Law 19-307 provided that this chapter shall apply as of May 1, 2013.